Vermont, session 2025-2026, S172.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 23 V.S.A. § 3306 is amended to read:
§ 3306. LIGHTS AND EQUIPMENT
* * *
(b)(1) Personal flotation devices. Each vessel, except sailboards, shall,
consistent with federal regulations, carry for each individual aboard at least
one wearable U.S. Coast Guard-approved personal flotation device that is in
good and serviceable condition and capable of being used in accordance with
the U.S. Coast Guard approval label.
VT LEG #385536 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.172
2026 Page 2 of 2
* * *
(4) Cold weather. On or before May 1 of each year and on or after
November 1 of each year, all individuals aboard a vessel, while under way and
the individual is on an open deck, shall wear a properly secured wearable U.S.
Coast Guard-approved personal flotation device as intended by the
manufacturer.
(5) Inspected commercial vessels. U.S. Coast Guard-inspected
commercial vessels shall be exempt from the provisions of this subsection.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385536 v.1